Texas, session 892, HB75.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 141.009, Health and Safety Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 141.009.  STANDARDS. (a)  The executive commissioner by rule shall establish health and safety standards for youth camps. The standards may relate to: (1)  adequate and proper supervision at all times of camp activities; (2)  qualifications for directors, supervisors, and staff and sufficient numbers of those persons; (3)  proper safeguards for sanitation and public health; (4)  adequate medical services for personal health and first aid; (5)  proper procedures for food preparation, handling, and mass feeding; (6)  healthful and sufficient water supply; (7)  proper waste disposal; (8)  proper water safety procedures for swimming pools, lakes, and waterways; (9)  safe boating equipment; (10)  proper maintenance and safe use of motor vehicles; (11)  safe buildings and physical facilities; (12)  proper fire precautions; (13)  safe and proper recreational and other equipment; (14)  proper regard for density and use of the premises; and (15)  records of criminal convictions of camp personnel. (b)  The executive commissioner by rule shall establish minimum building standards for youth camps to minimize and prevent flooding of a camp's buildings and other physical facilities located within a 100-year floodplain or within five feet of a 100-year floodplain. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution.  If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.